Ohio, session 136, SB114.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Ohio:
S 1. That section 109.70 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows:
ECTION
Sec. 109.70. (A) As used in this section:
(1) "Law enforcement official or agency" means any of the following that has jurisdiction
over the applicable local or state police officer listed in division (A)(2)(a), (b), (c), (d), (e), (f), or (g)
of this section that corresponds with the respective division (A)(1)(a), (b), (c), (d), (e), (f), or (g) of
this section:
(a) A county sheriff;
(b) A village marshal;
(c) The organized police department of a municipal corporation;
(d) The organized police department of a township;
(e) A board of township trustees that appoints a township constable;
(f) The board of a township police district or of a joint police district;
(g) The state highway patrol.
(2) "Local or state police officer" means any of the following who is under the jurisdiction of
the applicable law enforcement official or agency listed in division (A)(1)(a), (b), (c), (d), (e), (f), or
(g) of this section that corresponds with the respective division (A)(2)(a), (b), (c), (d), (e), (f), or (g)
of this section:
(a) A county deputy sheriff;
(b) A village deputy marshal;
(c) A member of the organized police department of a municipal corporation;
(d) A member of the organized police department of a township;
(e) A police constable appointed by a board of township trustees;
(f) A member of the police force of a township police district or of a joint police district;
(g) A highway patrol trooper of the state highway patrol.
(3) "Quota" means a mandate of a finite number of arrests made or citations issued for any
offense that a local or state police officer must meet in a specified time period.
(B) No law enforcement official or agency shall do any of the following:
(1) Establish or maintain, formally or informally, a plan utilizing a quota as the basis by
which to evaluate, promote, compensate, transfer, or discipline a local or state police officer over

S. B. No. 114 136th G.A.
2
whom the law enforcement official or agency has jurisdiction;
(2) Require a local or state police officer described in division (B)(1) of this section, or
suggest to the police officer, that the police officer is required or expected to meet a quota;
(3) Offer a financial reward or other benefit to a local or state police officer described in
division (B)(1) of this section that is determined by or based on the quota of that police officer.
(C) This section does not prohibit a law enforcement official or agency from doing any of
the following:
(1) Collecting, analyzing, and applying any information concerning the number of arrests
made and citations issued in order to ensure that a particular local or state police officer or group of
local or state police officers does not violate an applicable legal obligation of the officer or officers;
(2) Assessing the proportion of the arrests made, and citations issued, by a local or state
police officer or group of local or state police officers.
(D)(1) The attorney general shall establish a form that any local or state police officer may
access on the web site of the attorney general for the purpose of reporting the use of quotas in
violation of division (B)(1), (2), or (3) of this section by the law enforcement official or agency that
has jurisdiction over the local or state police officer. Upon receiving a report, including a report
submitted by an unidentified complainant, under this division, the attorney general shall investigate
the alleged use of quotas in violation of any of those divisions by the law enforcement official or
agency that is the subject of the report and whether any of the circumstances described in division
(C) of this section apply. The investigation shall be conducted within one year after receiving the
report.
(2) The attorney general shall determine the procedure for the investigation conducted under
division (D)(1) of this section on a case-by-case basis and shall provide the law enforcement official
or agency that is the subject of the investigation an opportunity to be heard. If after the investigation
the attorney general finds that the law enforcement official or agency uses quotas in violation of
division (B)(1), (2), or (3) of this section, the attorney general shall order the law enforcement
official or agency to cease and desist from using quotas in violation of any of those divisions.

S. B. No. 114 136th G.A.
Speaker ___________________ of the House of Representatives.
President ___________________ of the Senate.
Passed ________________________, 20____
Approved ________________________, 20____
Governor.

S. B. No. 114 136th G.A.
The section numbering of law of a general and permanent nature is
complete and in conformity with the Revised Code.
Director, Legislative Service Commission.
Filed in the office of the Secretary of State at Columbus, Ohio, on the ____
day of ___________, A. D. 20____.
Secretary of State.
File No. _________ Effective Date ___________________